Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.410

Collecting blood samples without consent under direction of law enforcement.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

It is not professional misconduct for a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-phlebotomist, or forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, or person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or hospital, or duly licensed clinical laboratory employing or utilizing services of such licensed or certified health care provider, to collect a blood sample without a person's consent when the physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-phlebotomist, or forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, or person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or hospital, or duly licensed clinical laboratory employing or utilizing services of such licensed or certified health care provider withdrawing blood was directed by a law enforcement officer to do so for the purpose of a blood test under the provisions of a search warrant or exigent circumstances: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall relieve a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW; osteopathic physician licensed under chapter 18.57 RCW; registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW; physician assistant licensed under chapter 18.71A RCW; advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic certified under chapter 18.71 RCW; or medical assistant-certified, medical assistant-phlebotomist, or forensic phlebotomist certified under chapter 18.360 RCW, or person holding another credential under Title 18 RCW whose scope of practice includes performing venous blood draws, or hospital, or duly licensed clinical laboratory employing or utilizing services of such licensed or certified health care provider withdrawing blood from professional discipline arising from the use of improper procedures or from failing to exercise the required standard of care.

[2020 c 80 s 24; 2017 c 336 s 9; 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 21.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Finding—2017 c 336: See note following RCW 9.96.060.

Finding—Intent—2015 2nd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 10.21.055.